Wisconsin, session 2025, AB274.
do enact as follows:AB274,11Section 1. 35.93 (2) (b) 3. gn. of the statutes is created to read:AB274,2,3235.93 (2) (b) 3. gn. Notices of readoption of Wisconsin administrative code 3chapters received under s. 227.225 (2) (a).AB274,24Section 2. 35.93 (2) (b) 3. gp. of the statutes is created to read:AB274,2,5535.93 (2) (b) 3. gp. Objections to readoption notices under s. 227.225 (2) (c).AB274,36Section 3. 35.93 (2) (b) 3. gq. of the statutes is created to read:AB274,2,8735.93 (2) (b) 3. gq. Statements of extension of Wisconsin administrative code 8chapters received under s. 227.225 (4) (c).AB274,49Section 4. 35.93 (2) (c) 2m. of the statutes is created to read:AB274,2,111035.93 (2) (c) 2m. Chapters of the Wisconsin administrative code removed 11under sub. (3) (g).AB274,512Section 5. 35.93 (3) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB274,3,21335.93 (3) (g) On or after the date that a chapter of the Wisconsin 1administrative code expires under s. 227.225, the legislative reference bureau shall 2remove the chapter from the Wisconsin administrative code.AB274,63Section 6. 227.10 (3) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB274,3,54227.10 (3) (f) An agency shall avoid in rules the use of words or phrases that 5are outdated or that are now understood to be derogatory or offensive.AB274,76Section 7. 227.114 (2) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB274,3,97227.114 (2) (intro.) When an agency proposes or revises promulgates a rule 8that may have an effect on small businesses, the agency shall consider each of the 9following methods for reducing the impact of the rule on small businesses:AB274,810Section 8. 227.135 (1) (g) of the statutes is created to read:AB274,3,1211227.135 (1) (g) If the rule is a rule to readopt a chapter of the code under s. 12227.225 (3), a statement to that effect.AB274,913Section 9. 227.137 (3) (h) of the statutes is created to read:AB274,3,1614227.137 (3) (h) If the proposed rule seeks to readopt a chapter of the code 15under s. 227.225 (3), an analysis of how actual costs for the rule compare to a 16previous economic impact analysis, if any, for a rule affecting the chapter.AB274,1017Section 10. 227.14 (6) (c) 1. (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB274,3,2018227.14 (6) (c) 1. (intro.) A Except as provided in subd. 1m., a proposed rule 19shall be considered withdrawn on whichever of the following dates occurs first, 20unless it is withdrawn sooner by the agency under par. (b):AB274,1121Section 11. 227.14 (6) (c) 1m. of the statutes is created to read:AB274,4,222227.14 (6) (c) 1m. A proposed rule to readopt a chapter of the code under s. 23227.225 (3) shall be considered withdrawn on the date that chapter expires under s. 1227.225 (1) unless it has been filed with the legislative reference bureau under s. 2227.20 (1) or withdrawn sooner by the agency under par. (b).AB274,123Section 12. 227.15 (3) of the statutes is renumbered 227.15 (3) (a).AB274,134Section 13. 227.15 (3) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB274,4,115227.15 (3) (b) When a proposed readoption notice for a chapter of the code 6under s. 227.225 (2) is before a standing committee of the legislature or the joint 7committee for review of administrative rules, the legislative council staff shall 8report to that committee on what actions, if any, were taken by standing committees 9or the joint committee for review of administrative rules the last time a readoption 10notice for that chapter was considered or a rule affecting that chapter of the code 11was before the legislature under s. 227.19.AB274,1412Section 14. 227.15 (7) of the statutes is amended to read:AB274,4,1613227.15 (7) Rules procedures manual. The legislative council staff and the 14legislative reference bureau shall prepare a manual to provide agencies with 15information on drafting, promulgation and legislative review of rules. The manual 16shall prescribe the format for readoption rules under s. 227.225 (3).AB274,1517Section 15. 227.225 of the statutes is created to read:AB274,4,2318227.225 Expiration and readoption of rules. (1) (a) Each chapter of the 19code expires on the January 1 of the 7th year after the year in which a rule creating, 20repealing and recreating, or readopting that chapter of the code takes effect as 21provided in s. 227.22, unless the rule provides for an earlier repeal date, or on the 22January 1 of the 7th year after the year in which the chapter is readopted under 23sub. (2) (d).AB274,5,41(b) 1. Notwithstanding par. (a), a chapter of the code that was in effect on the 2effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], and that is not repealed and 3recreated by a rule prior to January 1, 2035, shall expire in accordance with the 4schedule established under subd. 2. unless it is repealed earlier.AB274,5,1252. The joint committee for review of administrative rules shall, in consultation 6with the affected agencies and within one year after the effective date of this 7subdivision .... [LRB inserts date], establish a schedule for the expiration of all 8chapters described under subd. 1. The schedule may provide for the expiration of 9code chapters on any January 1 beginning with January 1, 2028, and ending with 10January 1, 2035. The joint committee for review of administrative rules shall have 11the schedule published on the legislature’s website and shall provide a copy of the 12schedule to each affected agency.AB274,5,1413(c) A change made by the legislative reference bureau under s. 13.92 (4) (b) 14does not affect a chapter’s expiration date under par. (a) or (b).AB274,5,1615(d) This subsection does not apply to emergency rules promulgated under s. 16227.24.AB274,6,617(2) (a) No earlier than January 1 and no later than March 1 of the year 18preceding the expiration date of a chapter of the code, an agency may submit to the 19chief clerk of each house of the legislature and to the joint committee for review of 20administrative rules a notice that it intends to readopt the expiring chapter. The 21notice shall be submitted in triplicate. An agency may not propose to readopt more 22than one chapter per notice. The presiding officer of each house of the legislature 23shall, within 10 working days after the date on which the notice is received, direct 1the appropriate chief clerk to refer the notice to one standing committee and to 2enter a statement that a proposed code chapter readoption notice has been received 3in the journal of his or her house. The agency shall submit a copy of the notice, in 4an electronic format approved by the legislative reference bureau, to the legislative 5reference bureau for publication in the register. The notice shall contain all of the 6following:AB274,6,771. A brief statement explaining the basis and purpose of the chapter.AB274,6,1182. A reference to each statute that is interpreted by any rules contained in the 9chapter, a reference to each statute that authorizes the promulgation of any rules 10contained in that chapter, and an explanation of the agency’s authority to 11promulgate the rules contained in the chapter under those statutes.AB274,6,14123. A statement affirming that all rules contained in the chapter are in 13compliance with the requirements under this subchapter and are not otherwise in 14need of revision due to changes to state or federal law or for any other reason.AB274,6,1815(b) Upon receipt of a readoption notice under par. (a), the chairperson or 16cochairpersons of each standing committee and the joint committee for review of 17administrative rules shall provide a copy of the notice to each other member of the 18committee.AB274,7,419(c) The review period for each standing committee and the joint committee for 20review of administrative rules extends for 40 days after the agency submits the 21readoption notice under par. (a). Any member of either standing committee or of 22the joint committee for review of administrative rules may object to readoption of 23the code chapter within that period. Such an objection shall be made in writing. If 1a committee member objects to the readoption, the chairperson or chairpersons of 2the committee shall provide a copy of the objection to each other committee that 3received the notice under par. (a), to the agency that submitted the notice, and to 4the legislative reference bureau for publication in the register.AB274,7,85(d) If the review period under par. (c) expires with no objection from a member 6of either standing committee or the joint committee for review of administrative 7rules, the chapter shall be considered readopted for purposes of sub. (1) (a) without 8further action.AB274,7,129(e) If a member of either standing committee or the joint committee for review 10of administrative rules objects to readoption of the chapter within the review period 11under par. (c), the chapter shall, subject to sub. (4), expire on its expiration date 12unless the agency promulgates a rule under sub. (3) to readopt the chapter.AB274,7,1613(3) If a committee member objects to the readoption of a chapter under sub. 14(2) (e), the agency may, using the rule-making process in this chapter, promulgate a 15rule to readopt the chapter. All of the following apply with respect to a rule 16promulgated under this subsection:AB274,7,1717(a) An agency may not propose to readopt more than one chapter per rule. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab274 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab274 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB274 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB274 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB274: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting